Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-1623
Plan administrator; duties.

Any plan administrator for health care plans offered under the Nebraska State Insurance Program shall cooperate with the implementation of the pilot program and shall share real-time claims data for state employees participating in the pilot program with participating providers.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 6.
July 19, 2018